Illinois, session 104th, SB2606.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The sum of $32,423,200, or so much thereof as 6may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to meet the ordinary and contingent expenses of the 8Office of the State Comptroller, which includes in part, the 9approximate sum of $250,000 for the Comptroller's Office of 10Inspector General. 11    Section 10. The sum of $1,500,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated to the State Comptroller 13from the Comptroller's Administrative Fund for the discharge 14of duties of the office. 15    Section 15. The sum of $50,300, or so much thereof as may 16be necessary, is appropriated to the State Comptroller from 17the State Lottery Fund for expenses in connection with the 18State Lottery. 19    Section 20. The sum of $108,370,400, or so much thereof as 20may be necessary, is appropriated from the Personal Property   SB2606- 2 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1Tax Replacement Fund to the State Comptroller for ordinary and 2contingent expenses associated with the payment to official 3Court reporters pursuant to law. 4    Section 25. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 6from the General Revenue Fund to the State Comptroller to pay 7the elected State officers of the Executive Branch of the 8State Government, at various rates prescribed by law:9  For the Governor....................................237,90010  For the Lieutenant Governor.........................186,10011  For the Secretary of State..........................212,00012  For the Attorney General............................212,00013  For the Comptroller.................................186,10014  For the State Treasurer.............................186,10015    Total                                          $1,220,200 16    Section 30. The following named amounts, or so much 17thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to 18the State Comptroller to pay certain appointed officers of the 19Executive Branch of the State Government, at the various rates 20prescribed by law:21From General Revenue Fund:22  Department on Aging23   For the Director...................................190,90024  Department of Central Management Services  SB2606- 3 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1   For the Director...................................225,6002   For 2 Assistant Directors..........................383,4003  Department of Corrections4   For the Director...................................231,4005   For the Assistant Director.........................196,7006  Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity7   For the Director...................................225,6008   For 2 Assistant Director...........................383,4009  Environmental Protection Agency10   For the Director...................................208,40011   For the Electric Vehicle Coordinator...............208,40012  Department of Early Childhood13   For the Secretary..................................225,60014  Department of Human Services15   For the Secretary..................................231,40016   For 3 Assistant Secretaries........................589,90017  Department of Juvenile Justice18   For the Director...................................190,90019  Department of Labor20   For the Director...................................208,20021   For the Assistant Director.........................181,20022   For the Chief Factory Inspector.....................64,90023   For the Superintendent of Safety Inspection24    and Education......................................71,40025  Illinois State Police26   For the Director...................................231,400  SB2606- 4 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1   For the Assistant Director.........................161,7002  Department of Military Affairs3   For the Adjutant General...........................190,9004   For two Chief Assistants to the5    Adjutant General..................................324,5006  Department of Natural Resources7   For six Mine Officers..............................116,8008  Illinois Labor Relations Board9   For the Chairman...................................129,80010   For four State Labor Relations Board11    members...........................................467,00012   For two Local Labor Relations Board13    members...........................................233,50014   For the Local Labor Relations Board Chairman.......116,80015  Department of Healthcare and Family Services16   For the Director...................................225,60017   For the Assistant Director.........................191,70018  Department of Public Health19   For the Director...................................231,40020   For the Assistant Director.........................196,70021  Department of Revenue22   For the Director...................................225,60023   For the Assistant Director.........................191,70024  Property Tax Appeal Board25   For the Chairman....................................80,50026   For four members...................................259,500  SB2606- 5 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1  Department of Veterans' Affairs2   For the Director...................................231,4003   For the Assistant Director.........................196,7004  Civil Service Commission5   For the Chairman....................................37,8006   For four members...................................125,9007  Commerce Commission8   For the Chairman...................................166,6009   For four members...................................582,00010  Court of Claims11   For the Chief Judge.................................80,80012   For the six Judges.................................446,90013  Commission on Equity and Inclusion14   For the Chairman...................................155,40015   For six members....................................887,50016  State Board of Elections17   For the Chairman....................................72,70018   For the Vice-Chairman...............................59,70019   For six members....................................280,20020  Department of Human Rights21   For the Director...................................190,90022  Human Rights Commission23   For the Chairman...................................155,40024   For six members....................................887,50025  Liquor Control Commission26   For the Chairman....................................48,400  SB2606- 6 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1   For six members....................................254,0002   For the Secretary...................................46,7003   For the Chairman and one member as4    designated by law, $200 per diem5    for work on a license appeal6    commission.........................................55,0007  Executive Ethics Commission8   For nine members...................................420,3009  Pollution Control Board10   For the Chairman...................................150,50011   For four members...................................582,00012  Prisoner Review Board13   For the Chairman...................................119,20014   For fourteen members of the15  Prisoner Review Board.............................1,494,60016  Secretary of State Merit Commission17   For the Chairman.........................................018   For four members....................................64,20019  Educational Labor Relations Board20   For the Chairman...................................129,80021   For four members...................................467,00022  Illinois State Police23   For seven members of the State Police24    Merit Board, $294 per diem,25    whichever is applicable in accordance26    with law, for a maximum of 100  SB2606- 7 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1    days each.........................................205,7002  Firearm Owner's Identification Card Review Board3   For seven members..................................326,9004  Office of Small Business Utility Advocate5   For the small business utility advocate..................06    Total                                         $16,513,700 7    Section 35. The following named sums, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated from the 9General Revenue Fund to the State Comptroller to pay certain 10officers of the Legislative Branch of the State Government, at 11the various rates prescribed by law:12Office of Auditor General13  For the Auditor General.............................212,80014  For two Deputy Auditor Generals.....................306,20015    Total                                            $519,000 16  For salaries of the members of the General Assembly, for 17both the House of Representatives and the Senate; including 18base salary of $98,304 for each member of the General 19Assembly and additional amounts, as prescribed by law, for 20Speaker of the House, President of the Senate, Minority 21Leader of the House, Minority Leader of the Senate, Speaker 22Pro Tempore of the House, President Pro Tempore of the 23Senate, Majority Leaders in both chambers, 10 assistant 24majority and minority leaders in the Senate, 12 assistant   SB2606- 8 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1majority and minority leaders, majority and minority caucus 2chairmen in the Senate, majority and minority conference 3chairmen in the House, 2 Deputy Majority and the 2 Deputy 4Minority leaders in the House, Majority Officer in the House, 5Majority Officer in the Senate, chairmen and minority 6spokesmen of standing committees in the Senate (except the 7Committee on Assignments), and chairmen and minority 8spokesmen of standing committees in the House.....$20,449,600 9  For per diem allowances for the10   members of the Senate, as11   provided by law....................................470,00012  For per diem allowances for the13   members of the House, as14   provided by law..................................1,060,00015  For mileage for all members of the16   General Assembly, as provided17   by law.............................................700,00018    Total                                          $2,230,000 19    Section 40. The following named sums, or so much thereof 20as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated to the 21State Comptroller to pay certain appointed officers of the 22Executive Branch of the State Government, at the various rates 23prescribed by law:24Department of Agriculture  SB2606- 9 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1  For the Director2   From Feed Control Fund.............................208,2003  For the Assistant Director4   From Feed Control Fund.............................181,2005Department of Children and Family Services 6  For the Director7   From DCFS Children's Services Fund.................231,4008Illinois Emergency Management Agency9  For the Director10   From Nuclear Safety Emergency 11   Preparedness Fund .................................208,20012  For the Assistant Director13   From Radiation Protection Fund.....................181,20014Department of Financial and Professional  15 Regulation16  From the Professions Indirect Cost Fund17   For the Secretary..................................225,60018   For the Director...................................208,20019   For the Director...................................208,20020Illinois Power Agency21  For the Director22   From the Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund.....214,00023Department of Insurance24  From the Insurance Producer Administration Fund25   For the Director..................................208,200 26   For the Assistant Director.........................181,200  SB2606- 10 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1Department of Lottery2   For the Superintendent3    From State Lottery Fund...........................208,2004Department of Natural Resources5  Payable from Park and Conservation Fund6   For the Director...................................208,2007   For the Assistant Director.........................181,2008Department of Transportation9  Payable from Road Fund10   For the Secretary..................................231,40011   For the Assistant Secretary........................196,70012Illinois Workers' Compensation Commission13  Payable from Illinois Workers' Compensation14   Commission Operations Fund15   For the Chairman...................................189,80016   For nine members.................................1,626,40017Office of the State Fire Marshal18  For the State Fire Marshal:19   From Fire Prevention Fund..........................190,90020Illinois Racing Board21  For eleven members of the Illinois22   Racing Board, $300 per diem to a23   maximum $15,569 as prescribed by law:24   From the Horse Racing Fund.........................171,30025Department of Employment Security 26 Payable from Title III Social Security and   SB2606- 11 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1  Employment Fund:2   For the Director...................................225,6003   For five members of the Board4    of Review..........................................75,0005Department of Innovation and Technology 6 Payable from Technology Management 7  Revolving Fund:8   For the Secretary..................................231,4009   For the Assistant Secretary........................196,70010Department of Real Estate 11 Payable from Real Estate License 12  Administration Fund:13   For the Director...................................208,20014Department of Financial and Professional Regulation 15 Payable from Bank and Trust Company Fund:16  For the Director....................................208,20017Subtotals:18  Feed Control Fund...................................389,40019  DCFS Children's Services Fund.......................231,40020  Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund..........208,20021  Radiation Protection Fund...........................181,20022  Professions Indirect Cost Fund......................642,00023  Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund...............214,00024  Insurance Producer Administration Fund..............389,40025  State Lottery Fund..................................208,20026  Park and Conservation Fund..........................389,400  SB2606- 12 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1  Road Fund...........................................428,1002  Illinois Workers' Compensation3  Commission Operations Fund........................1,816,2004  Fire Prevention Fund................................190,9005  Horse Racing Fund...................................171,3006  Bank and Trust Company Fund.........................208,2007  Title III Social Security and8   Employment Fund....................................300,6009  Technology Management Revolving Fund................428,10010  Real Estate License Administration Fund.............208,200 11    Section 45. The following named amounts, or so much 12thereof as may be necessary, respectively, for the objects and 13purposes hereinafter named, are appropriated to the State 14Comptroller in connection with the payment of salaries for 15officers of the Executive and Legislative Branches of State 16Government:17For State Contribution to State Employees' 18 Retirement System:19  From Horse Racing Fund....................................020  From Fire Prevention Fund............................97,30021  From Bank and Trust Company Fund....................106,10022  From Title III Social Security23   and Employment Fund................................153,20024  From Feed and Control Fund..........................198,50025  From DCFS Children's Services Fund..................117,900  SB2606- 13 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1  From Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund.....106,1002  From Radiation Protection Fund.......................92,4003  From Professions Indirect Cost Fund.................327,2004  From Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund..........109,1005  From Insurance Producer Administration Fund.........198,5006  From State Lottery Fund.............................106,1007  From Park and Conservation Fund.....................198,5008  From Road Fund......................................218,1009  From Illinois Workers' Compensation10   Commission Operations Fund.........................925,70011  From Technology Management Revolving Fund...........218,10012  From Real Estate License Administration Fund........106,10013    Total                                          $3,278,90014For State Contribution to Social Security:15  From General Revenue Fund.........................1,731,30016  From Horse Racing Fund...............................13,20017  From Fire Prevention Fund............................13,70018  From Bank and Trust Company Fund.....................14,00019  From Title III Social Security20   and Employment Fund.................................20,00021  From Feed Control Fund...............................27,50022  From DCFS Children's Services Fund...................14,30023  From Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund......14,00024  From Radiation Protection Fund.......................13,60025  From Professions Indirect Cost Fund..................42,10026  From Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund...........14,100  SB2606- 14 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1  From Insurance Producer Administration Fund..........27,5002  From State Lottery Fund..............................14,0003  From Park and Conservation Fund......................27,5004  From Road Fund.......................................28,1005  From Illinois Workers' Compensation6   Commission Operations Fund.........................135,6007  From Technology Management Revolving Fund............28,1008  From Real Estate License Administration Fund.........14,0009    Total                                          $2,192,60010For Group Insurance:11  From Fire Prevention Fund............................33,20012  From Bank and Trust Company Fund.....................33,20013  From Title III Social Security and14   Employment Fund.....................................33,20015  From Feed Control Fund...............................66,40016  From DCFS Children's Services Fund...................33,20017  From Nuclear Safety Emergency Preparedness Fund......33,20018  From Radiation Protection Fund.......................33,20019  From Professions Indirect Cost Fund..................99,60020  From Illinois Power Agency Operations Fund...........33,20021  From Insurance Producer Administration Fund..........66,40022  From State Lottery Fund..............................33,20023  From Park and Conservation Fund......................66,40024  From Road Fund.......................................66,40025  From Illinois Workers' Compensation26   Commission Operations Fund.........................332,000  SB2606- 15 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1  From Technology Management Revolving Fund............66,4002  From Real Estate License Administration Fund.........33,2003    Total                                          $1,062,400 4    Section 50. The following named amounts, or so much 5thereof as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 6from the General Revenue Fund to the State Comptroller to pay 7certain appointed officers of the Executive Branch of the 8State Government, at the various rates prescribed by law:9Executive Inspector Generals10  For the Executive Inspector General for the11   Office of the Governor.............................214,80012  For the Executive Inspector General for the13   Office of the Attorney General.....................170,80014  For the Executive Inspector General for the15   Office of the Secretary of State...................170,80016  For the Executive Inspector General for the17   Office of the Comptroller..........................148,70018  For the Executive Inspector General for the19   Office of the Treasurer............................148,70020    Total                                            $853,800 21    Section 55. The amount of $1,952,900, or so much thereof 22as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 23Fund to the State Comptroller for contingencies in the event 24that any amounts appropriated in Sections 35 through 60 of   SB2606- 16 -SDS104 00016 JMS 10016 b1this Article are insufficient. 2ARTICLE 23    Section 5.The sum of $26,000,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary and in addition to other amounts that may be 5appropriated, is appropriated to the State Comptroller from 6the Capital Development Fund to the Office of the Comptroller 7for technology modernization of the Payroll System and other 8Statewide Legacy Systems and maintenance of information 9technology systems and infrastructure and other costs. 10ARTICLE 311    Section 99. Effective date. This Act take effect July 1, 122025.